North Dakota statutes. TITLE 28 Judicial Procedure, Civil
CHAPTER 28-32 Administrative Agencies Practice Act
28-32-37.
Ex parte communications.

Except as provided in subsections 2 and 4 or unless required for the disposition of ex parte matters specifically authorized by another statute, an agency head or hearing officer in an adjudicative proceeding may not communicate, directly or indirectly, regarding any issue in the proceeding, while the proceeding is pending, with any party, with any person who has a direct or indirect interest in the outcome of the proceeding, with any other person allowed to participate in the proceeding, or with any person who presided at a previous stage of the proceeding, without notice and opportunity for all parties to participate in the communication.

When more than one person is the hearing officer in an adjudicative proceeding, those persons may communicate with each other regarding a matter pending before the panel. An agency head or hearing officer may communicate with or receive aid from staff assistants if the assistants do not furnish, augment, diminish, or modify the evidence in the record.

Except as provided in subsection 4 or unless required for the disposition of ex parte matters specifically authorized by statute, no party to an adjudicative proceeding, no person who has a direct or indirect interest in the outcome of the proceeding, no person allowed to participate in the proceeding, and no person who presided at a previous stage in the proceeding may communicate directly or indirectly in connection with any issue in that proceeding, while the proceeding is pending, with any agency head or hearing officer in the proceeding without notice and opportunity for all parties to participate in the communication.

In an adjudicative proceeding conducted by a hearing officer other than the agency head, counsel for the administrative agency and the agency head, without notice and opportunity for all parties to participate, may communicate and consult regarding the status of the adjudicative proceeding, discovery, settlement, litigation decisions, and other matters commonly communicated between attorney and client, to permit the agency head to make informed decisions. This subsection does not apply after recommended findings of fact, conclusions of law, and orders have been issued, except counsel for the administrative agency and the agency head may communicate regarding settlement and negotiation after recommended findings of fact, conclusions of law, and orders have been issued.

If, before being assigned, designated, or appointed to preside in an adjudicative proceeding, a person receives an ex parte communication of a type that could not properly be received while presiding, the person, promptly after being assigned, designated, or appointed, shall disclose the communication in the manner prescribed in subsection 6.

An agency head or hearing officer in an adjudicative proceeding who receives an ex parte communication in violation of this section shall place on the record of the pending matter all written communications received, all written responses to the communications, or a memorandum stating the substance of all oral communications received, all responses made, and the identity of each person from whom the person received an ex parte oral communication, and shall advise all parties, interested persons, and other persons allowed to participate that these matters have been placed on the record. Any person desiring to rebut the ex parte communication must be allowed to do so, upon requesting the opportunity for rebuttal. A request for rebuttal must be made within ten days after notice of the communication.

If necessary to eliminate the effect of an ex parte communication received in violation of this section, an agency head or hearing officer in an adjudicative proceeding who receives the communication may be disqualified, upon good cause being shown in writing to the hearing officer or to the agency. The portions of the record pertaining to the communication may be sealed by protective order issued by the agency.

The agency shall, and any party may, report any willful violation of this section to the appropriate authorities for any disciplinary proceedings provided by law. In addition, an administrative agency may, by rule, provide for appropriate sanctions, including default, for any violations of this section.

Nothing in this section prohibits a member of the general public, not acting on behalf or at the request of any party, from communicating with an agency in cases of general interest. The agency shall disclose such written communications in adjudicative proceedings.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12.

28-32-38.
Separation of functions.

No person who has served as investigator, prosecutor, or advocate in the investigatory or prehearing stage of an adjudicative proceeding may serve as hearing officer.

No person who is subject to the direct authority of one who has served as an investigator, prosecutor, or advocate in the investigatory or prehearing stage of an adjudicative proceeding may serve as hearing officer.

Any other person may serve as hearing officer in an adjudicative proceeding, unless a party demonstrates grounds for disqualification.

Any person may serve as hearing officer at successive stages of the same adjudicative proceeding, unless a party demonstrates grounds for disqualification.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12.

28-32-39.
Adjudicative proceedings — Findings of fact, conclusions of law, and order of agency — Notice.

In an adjudicative proceeding an administrative agency shall make and state concisely and explicitly its findings of fact and its separate conclusions of law and the order of the agency based upon its findings and conclusions.

If the agency head, or another person authorized by the agency head or by law to issue a final order, is presiding, the order issued is the final order. The agency shall serve a copy of the final order and the findings of fact and conclusions of law on which it is based upon all the parties to the proceeding within thirty days after the evidence has been received, briefs filed, and arguments closed, or as soon thereafter as possible, in the manner allowed for service under the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure.

If the agency head, or another person authorized by the agency head or by law to issue a final order, is not presiding, then the person presiding shall issue recommended findings of fact and conclusions of law and a recommended order within thirty days after the evidence has been received, briefs filed, and arguments closed, or as soon thereafter as possible. The recommended findings of fact and conclusions of law and the recommended order become final unless specifically amended or rejected by the agency head. The agency head may adopt the recommended findings of fact and conclusions of law and the recommended order as final. The agency may allow petitions for review of a recommended order and may allow oral argument pending issuance of a final order. An administrative agency may adopt rules regarding the review of recommended orders and other procedures for issuance of a final order by the agency. If a recommended order is issued, the agency must serve a copy of any final order issued and the findings of fact and conclusions of law on which it is based upon all the parties to the proceeding within sixty days after the evidence has been received, briefs filed, and arguments closed, or as soon thereafter as possible, in the manner allowed for service under the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12.

28-32-40.
Petition for reconsideration.

Any party before an administrative agency who is aggrieved by the final order of the agency, including the administrative agency when the hearing officer is not the agency head or one or more members of the agency head, within fifteen days after notice has been given as required by section 28-32-39, may file a petition for reconsideration with the agency. Filing of the petition is not a prerequisite for seeking judicial review. If the agency’s hearing officer issues the agency’s final order, the petition for reconsideration must be addressed to the hearing officer, who may grant or deny the petition under subsection 4.

Any party, including workforce safety and insurance, that appears before workforce safety and insurance may file a petition for reconsideration within thirty days after notice has been given as required by section 28-32-39.

The party must submit with the petition for reconsideration a statement of the specific grounds upon which relief is requested or a statement of any further showing to be made in the proceeding. The petition must also state whether a rehearing is requested. The petition and any statement shall be considered a part of the record in the proceeding.

The administrative agency may deny the petition for reconsideration or may grant the petition on such terms as it may prescribe. If a rehearing is granted, the agency may allow a new hearing or limit the hearing as appropriate. The agency may dissolve or amend the final order and set the matter for further hearing. The petition is deemed to have been denied if the agency does not dispose of it within thirty days after the filing of the petition. Any rehearing must be presided over by the same person or persons presiding previously at the hearing, if available. Any amended findings, conclusions, and orders must be issued by the same person or persons who issued the previous recommended or final orders, if available. Within thirty days after the close of proceedings upon reconsideration, or as soon thereafter as possible, the agency shall issue and give notice of its order upon reconsideration as required in subsection 3 of section 28-32-39.

This section does not limit the right of any agency to reopen any proceeding or rehear any matter under any continuing jurisdiction which is granted to the agency by statute.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12; 2001, ch. 296, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2011, ch. 235, § 1.

Form of Petition.

When a motorist sent letters containing his request for “first of all a reopening of the administrative hearing . . . as a second choice an appeal to the District Court or whatever” to the hearing officer regarding the administrative suspension of his driver’s license, the Department of Transportation concluded that the motorist sought reconsideration of the order; the hearing officer then sent the motorist directions regarding proper petitions for reconsideration, and the motorist complied with the procedure. DuPaul v. N.D. DOT, 2003 ND 201, 672 N.W.2d 680, 2003 N.D. LEXIS 224 (N.D. 2003).

28-32-41.
Effectiveness of orders.

Unless a later date is stated in the order, a final order of an administrative agency is effective immediately, but a party may not be required to comply with a final order unless it has been served upon the party and notice is deemed given pursuant to section 28-32-39 or the party has actual knowledge of the final order. A nonparty may not be required to comply with a final order unless the agency has made the final order available for public inspection and copying or the nonparty has actual knowledge of the final order. This section does not preclude an agency from taking emergency action to protect the public health, safety, or welfare as authorized by statute.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12.

28-32-42.
Appeal from determination of agency — Time to appeal — How appeal taken.

Any party to any proceeding heard by an administrative agency, except when the order of the administrative agency is declared final by any other statute, may appeal from the order within thirty days after notice of the order has been given as required by section 28-32-39. If a reconsideration has been requested as provided in section 28-32-40, the party may appeal within thirty days after notice of the final determination upon reconsideration has been given as required by sections 28-32-39 and 28-32-40. If an agency does not dispose of a petition for reconsideration within thirty days after the filing of the petition, the agency is deemed to have made a final determination upon which an appeal may be taken.

Any interested person who has participated in the rulemaking process of an administrative agency may appeal the agency’s rulemaking action if the appeal is taken within ninety days after the date of publication in the North Dakota Administrative Code of the rule resulting from the agency rulemaking action.

The appeal of an order may be taken to the district court designated by law, and if none is designated, then to the district court of the county in which the hearing or a part thereof was held. If the administrative proceeding was disposed of informally, or for some other reason no hearing was held, an appeal may be taken to the district court of Burleigh County. Only final orders are appealable. A procedural order made by an administrative agency while a proceeding is pending before it is not a final order.

The appeal of an agency’s rulemaking action may be taken to the district court of Burleigh County.

An appeal shall be taken by serving a notice of appeal and specifications of error specifying the grounds on which the appeal is taken, upon the administrative agency concerned, upon the attorney general or an assistant attorney general, and upon all the parties to the proceeding before the administrative agency, and by filing the notice of appeal and specifications of error together with proof of service of the notice of appeal, and the undertaking required by this section, with the clerk of the district court to which the appeal is taken. In an appeal of an agency’s rulemaking action, only the administrative agency concerned, the attorney general, or an assistant attorney general, as well as the legislative council, need to be notified.

The notice of appeal must specify the parties taking the appeal as appellants. The agency and all other parties of record who are not designated as appellants must be named as appellees. A notice of appeal of agency rulemaking actions need not name all persons participating in the rulemaking proceeding as appellees. The agency and all parties of record have the right to participate in the appeal. In the appeal of agency rulemaking action, any person who has participated in the rulemaking process has the right to participate in the appeal.

A bond or other undertaking for costs on appeal must be filed by the appellant as is required by appellants for costs on appeal in civil cases under the rules of appellate procedure. The bond or other undertaking must be filed with the clerk of the district court with the notice of appeal, must be made to the state of North Dakota, and may be enforced by the agency concerned for and on behalf of the state as obligee. A bond or other undertaking is not required when filing fees have been waived by a district court pursuant to section 27-01-07 or when the costs of preparation and filing of the record of administrative agency proceedings have been waived by a district court pursuant to subsection 3 of section 28-32-44.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12.

Cross-References.

Appeal from insurance commissioner’s decision, see § 26.1-01-08.

Workers compensation bureau, appeal from decision, see § 65-10-01.

28-32-43.
Docketing of appeals.

Appeals taken in accordance with this chapter must be docketed as other cases pending in the district court are docketed and must be heard and determined by the court without a jury at such time as the court shall determine.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12.

28-32-44.
Agency to maintain and certify record on appeal.

An administrative agency shall maintain an official record of each adjudicative proceeding or other administrative proceeding heard by it.

Within thirty days, or a longer time as the court by order may direct, after an appeal has been taken to the district court as provided in this chapter, and after payment by the appellant of the estimated cost of preparation and filing of the entire record of the proceedings before the agency, the administrative agency concerned shall prepare and file in the office of the clerk of the district court in which the appeal is pending the original or a certified copy of the entire record of proceedings before the agency, or an abstract of the record as may be agreed upon and stipulated by the parties. Upon receiving a copy of the notice of appeal and specifications of error pursuant to subsection 4 of section 28-32-42 and unless the agency is appealing, the administrative agency shall notify the party appealing of the estimated costs of preparation and filing of the record. Thereafter, unless the agency is appealing, the party appealing shall pay the administrative agency the estimated costs required by this subsection. If the actual costs of preparation and filing of the entire record of the proceedings is greater than the estimated costs, the party appealing shall pay to the agency the difference. If the actual costs are less than the estimated costs, the agency shall pay to the party appealing the difference. Any payment for the costs of preparation and filing of the record must be paid into the insurance recovery fund and is appropriated as a refund to the agency for the purposes of defraying the costs of preparing and filing the record. An agency may contract with any person or another agency to prepare and file the record of any proceeding before the agency.

The cost of preparation and filing of the record may be waived by the district court upon application by an appellant, showing that the appellant is a low-income person unable to afford these costs. When a waiver is granted, the costs of preparation and filing of the record must be paid by the administrative agency.

The agency record of the proceedings, as applicable, may consist of only the following:

The complaint, answer, and other initial pleadings or documents.

Notices of all proceedings.

Any prehearing notices, transcripts, documents, or orders.

Any motions, pleadings, briefs, petitions, requests, and intermediate rulings.

A statement of matters officially noticed.

Offers of proof and objections and rulings thereon.

Proposed findings, requested orders, and exceptions.

The transcript of the hearing prepared for the person presiding at the hearing, including all testimony taken, and any written statements, exhibits, reports, memoranda, documents, or other information or evidence considered before final disposition of proceedings.

Any recommended or proposed order, recommended or proposed findings of fact and conclusions of law, final order, final findings of fact and conclusions of law, or findings of fact and conclusions of law or orders on reconsideration.

Any information considered pursuant to section 28-32-25.

Matters placed on the record after an ex parte communication.

Except to the extent that this chapter or another statute provides otherwise, the agency record constitutes the exclusive basis for administrative agency action and judicial review of an administrative agency action.

The record on review of agency rulemaking action, as applicable, may consist of only the following:

All agency notices concerning proposed rulemaking.

A copy of the proposed rule upon which written and oral submissions were made.

A copy of the rule as submitted for publication.

Any opinion letters by the attorney general as to a rule’s legality or the legality of the agency’s rulemaking action.

A copy of any interim rule and the agency’s findings and statement of the reasons for an interim rule.

The regulatory analysis of a proposed rule.

The transcript of any oral hearing on a proposed rule.

All written submissions made to the agency on a proposed rule.

Any staff memoranda or data prepared for agency consideration in regard to the proposed rule.

Any other document that the agency believes is relevant to the appeal.

Any other document that is not privileged and which is a public record that the appellant requests the agency to include in the record, if relevant to the appeal.

If the notice of appeal specifies that no exception or objection is made to the agency’s findings of fact, and that the appeal is concerned only with the agency’s conclusions of law based on the facts found by it, the agency may submit an abstract of the record along with such portions of the record as the agency deems necessary, to be supplemented by those portions of the record requested to be submitted by the appellant or by the other party when the agency is appealing.

The court may permit amendments or additions to the record filed by the administrative agency in order to complete the record.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12; 2001, ch. 296, § 2.

28-32-45.
Consideration of additional or excluded evidence.

If an application for leave to offer additional testimony, written statements, documents, exhibits, or other evidence is made to the court in which an appeal from a determination of an administrative agency is pending, and it is shown to the satisfaction of the court that the additional evidence is relevant and material and that there were reasonable grounds for the failure to offer the evidence in the hearing or proceeding, or that the evidence is relevant and material to the issues involved and was rejected or excluded by the agency, the court may order that the additional evidence be taken, heard, and considered by the agency on terms and conditions as the court may deem proper. After considering the additional evidence, the administrative agency may amend or reject its findings of fact, conclusions of law, and order and shall file with the court a transcript of the additional evidence with its new or amended findings of fact, conclusions of law, and order, if any, which constitute a part of the record with the court.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12.

28-32-46.
Scope of and procedure on appeal from determination of administrative agency.

A judge of the district court must review an appeal from the determination of an administrative agency based only on the record filed with the court. After a hearing, the filing of briefs, or other disposition of the matter as the judge may reasonably require, the court must affirm the order of the agency unless it finds that any of the following are present:

The order is not in accordance with the law.

The order is in violation of the constitutional rights of the appellant.

The provisions of this chapter have not been complied with in the proceedings before the agency.

The rules or procedure of the agency have not afforded the appellant a fair hearing.

The findings of fact made by the agency are not supported by a preponderance of the evidence.

The conclusions of law and order of the agency are not supported by its findings of fact.

The findings of fact made by the agency do not sufficiently address the evidence presented to the agency by the appellant.

The conclusions of law and order of the agency do not sufficiently explain the agency’s rationale for not adopting any contrary recommendations by a hearing officer or an administrative law judge.

If the order of the agency is not affirmed by the court, it must be modified or reversed, and the case shall be remanded to the agency for disposition in accordance with the order of the court.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12; 2001, ch. 296, § 3.

28-32-47.
Scope of and procedure on appeal from agency rulemaking.

A judge of the district court shall review an appeal from an administrative agency’s or ethics commission’s rulemaking action based only on the record filed with the court. If an appellant requests documents to be included in the record but the agency or commission does not include them, the court, upon application by the appellant, may compel their inclusion. After a hearing, the filing of briefs, or other disposition of the matter as the judge may reasonably require, the court shall affirm the rulemaking action unless it finds that any of the following are present:

The provisions of this chapter have not been substantially complied with in the rulemaking actions.

A rule published as a result of the rulemaking action appealed is unconstitutional on the face of the language adopted.

A rule published as a result of the rulemaking action appealed is beyond the scope of the agency’s or commission’s authority to adopt.

A rule published as a result of the rulemaking action appealed is on the face of the language adopted an arbitrary or capricious application of authority granted by statute.

If the rulemaking action of the agency or commission is not affirmed by the court, the rulemaking action must be remanded to the agency or commission for disposition in accordance with the order of the court, or the rule or a portion of the rule resulting from the rulemaking action of the agency or commission must be declared invalid for reasons stated by the court.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12; 2019, ch. 472, § 22, effective May 2, 2019.

28-32-48.
Appeal — Stay of proceedings.

An appeal from an order or the rulemaking action of an administrative agency or the commission does not stay the enforcement of the order or the effect of a published rule unless the court to which the appeal is taken, upon application and after a hearing or the submission of briefs, orders a stay. The court may impose terms and conditions for a stay of the enforcement of the order or for a stay in the effect of a published rule. This section does not prohibit the operation of an automatic stay upon the enforcement of an administrative order or commission order as may be required by another statute.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12; 2019, ch. 472, § 23, effective May 2, 2019.

28-32-49.
Review in supreme court.

The judgment of the district court in an appeal from an order or rulemaking action of an administrative agency or the commission may be reviewed in the supreme court on appeal in the same manner as provided in section 28-32-46 or 28-32-47, except that the appeal to the supreme court must be taken within sixty days after the service of the notice of entry of judgment in the district court. Any party of record, including the agency or commission, may take an appeal from the final judgment of the district court to the supreme court. If an appeal from the judgment of the district court is taken by an agency or the commission, the agency or commission may not be required to pay a docket fee or file a bond for costs or equivalent security.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12; 2019, ch. 472, § 24, effective May 2, 2019.

28-32-50.
Actions against administrative agencies — Attorney’s fees and costs.

In any civil judicial proceeding involving as adverse parties an administrative agency and a party not an administrative agency or an agent of an administrative agency, the court must award the party not an administrative agency reasonable attorney’s fees and costs if the court finds in favor of that party and, in the case of a final agency order, determines that the administrative agency acted without substantial justification.

This section applies to an administrative or civil judicial proceeding brought by a party not an administrative agency against an administrative agency for judicial review of a final agency order, or for judicial review pursuant to this chapter of the legality of agency rulemaking action or a rule adopted by an agency as a result of the rulemaking action being appealed.

Any attorney’s fees and costs awarded pursuant to this section must be paid from funds available to the administrative agency the final order, rulemaking action, or rule of which was reviewed by the court. The court may withhold all or part of the attorney’s fees from any award if the court finds the administrative agency’s action, in the case of a final agency order, was substantially justified or that special circumstances exist which make the award of all or a portion of the attorney’s fees unjust.

This section does not alter the rights of a party to collect any fees under other applicable law.

In any civil judicial proceeding involving adverse parties to an appeal or enforcement action involving an environmental permit issued under chapter 23.1-04, 23.1-06, 23.1-08, or 61-28 in which two or more of the adverse parties are not an administrative agency or an agent of an administrative agency, the court may award the prevailing nonagency party reasonable attorney’s fees and costs if the court finds in favor of that party and determines that the nonprevailing nonagency party acted without substantial justification, or on the basis of claims or allegations that are factually unsupported. The court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees and costs if the court determines that the nonprevailing nonagency party’s claims or allegations are frivolous as provided in section 28-26-01. If the appeal or civil judicial proceeding covered by this subsection involves multiple claims or allegations, the court may apportion attorney’s fees and costs in proportion to the time reasonably spent by a prevailing party relating to claims pursued by the nonprevailing party that were frivolous, factually unsupported, or without substantial justification.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12; 2007, ch. 280, § 1; 2017, ch. 199, § 32, effective April 29, 2019.

Note

This section is effective upon the receipt by the legislative council of the certification by the chief of the environmental health section of the state department of health attesting that all necessary federal approvals have been obtained and all necessary federal and other agreements have been amended to ensure the state will continue to meet the primacy requirements it currently satisfies after the transfer of authority, powers, and duties from the state department of health to the department of environmental quality provided under S.L. 2017, ch. 199, § 75. [Contingency met in 2019]

28-32-51.
Witnesses — Immunity.

If any person objects to testifying or producing evidence, documentary or otherwise, at any proceeding before an administrative agency, claiming a privilege against self-incrimination, but is directed to testify or produce evidence pursuant to the written approval of the attorney general, that person must comply with the direction but no testimony or evidence compelled from that person, after a valid claim of privilege against self-incrimination has been made, may be used against that person in any criminal proceeding subjecting that person to a penalty or forfeiture. No person testifying at any proceeding before an administrative agency may be exempted from prosecution and punishment for perjury or giving a false statement, or for contempt committed in answering, or failing to answer, or in producing, or in failing to produce, evidence pursuant to direction given under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12.

28-32-52.
Elected official authority.

This chapter does not prohibit an elected official from presiding at that agency’s cases, nor from deciding cases within that agency’s jurisdiction.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12.